Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-508
Sale, lease, or transfer; false statement, report, or certificate; penalty.

Whoever shall make, utter or subscribe to any statement and report, or certificate, required under the provisions of sections 70-506 and 70-507, knowing or having reason to believe that any such statement and report, or certificate, is false, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 6;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 6, p. 340;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-606;

R.S.1943, § 70-508;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 137.